scripts/ru_lemmas/pos/pron.lexd
LEXICON RuLemmasPron
māš<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
мāш<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
māšen<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
мāшен<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
maš<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
маш<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
mašen<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
машен<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
māš<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
мāш<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
māšen<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
мāшен<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
maš<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
маш<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
mašen<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
машен<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
māš<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
мāш<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
māšen<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
мāшен<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
maš<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
маш<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
mašen<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
машен<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
azor-tao<pron>:всякое<pron>
азор-тао<pron>:всякое<pron>
azor-taho<pron>:всякое<pron>
азор-таҳо<pron>:всякое<pron>
amdigar<pron>:взаимно<pron>
амдигар<pron>:взаимно<pron>
ar<pron>:каждый<pron>
ар<pron>:каждый<pron>
aramard<pron>:тем<pron>
арамард<pron>:тем<pron>
aramird<pron>:тем<pron>
арамирд<pron>:тем<pron>
arumard<pron>:тем<pron>
арумард<pron>:тем<pron>
k-aramard<pron>:тем<pron>
к-арамард<pron>:тем<pron>
k-aramird<pron>:тем<pron>
к-арамирд<pron>:тем<pron>
k-arumard<pron>:тем<pron>
к-арумард<pron>:тем<pron>
a-redri<pron>:тем<pron>
а-редри<pron>:тем<pron>
a-redrid<pron>:тем<pron>
а-редрид<pron>:тем<pron>
aredard<pron>:тем<pron>
аредард<pron>:тем<pron>
aredird<pron>:тем<pron>
аредирд<pron>:тем<pron>
aredra<pron>:тем<pron>
аредра<pron>:тем<pron>
k-a-redri<pron>:тем<pron>
к-а-редри<pron>:тем<pron>
k-a-redrid<pron>:тем<pron>
к-а-редрид<pron>:тем<pron>
k-aredard<pron>:тем<pron>
к-аредард<pron>:тем<pron>
k-aredird<pron>:тем<pron>
к-аредирд<pron>:тем<pron>
k-aredra<pron>:тем<pron>
к-аредра<pron>:тем<pron>
a-rānɣāǰ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
а-рāнғāҷ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
a-rānɣāǰ-aθ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
а-рāнғāҷ-аθ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
a-ranɣāǰ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
а-ранғāҷ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
a-ranɣāǰ-aθ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
а-ранғāҷ-аθ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
ar-rānɣāǰ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
ар-рāнғāҷ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
ar-rānɣāǰ-aθ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
ар-рāнғāҷ-аθ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
ar-ranɣāǰ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
ар-ранғāҷ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
ar-ranɣāǰ-aθ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
ар-ранғāҷ-аθ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
a-rāng-ca<pron>:чтото<pron>
а-рāнг-ца<pron>:чтото<pron>
a-rang-ca<pron>:чтото<pron>
а-ранг-ца<pron>:чтото<pron>
ar-rāng-ca<pron>:чтото<pron>
ар-рāнг-ца<pron>:чтото<pron>
ar-rang-ca<pron>:чтото<pron>
ар-ранг-ца<pron>:чтото<pron>
ar-tām<pron>:каждый<pron>
ар-тāм<pron>:каждый<pron>
ar-tān<pron>:каждый<pron>
ар-тāн<pron>:каждый<pron>
ar-cůn<pron>:все<pron>
ар-цу̊н<pron>:все<pron>
ar-cůnd<pron>:все<pron>
ар-цу̊нд<pron>:все<pron>
ar-čāy<pron>:каждый<pron>
ар-чāй<pron>:каждый<pron>
ar-čê<pron>:косв_к_арчй<pron>
ар-чê<pron>:косв_к_арчй<pron>
ar-či<pron>:косв_к_арчй<pron>
ар-чи<pron>:косв_к_арчй<pron>
ar-čī<pron>:косв_к_арчй<pron>
ар-чӣ<pron>:косв_к_арчй<pron>
ar-čidům<pron>:любой<pron>
ар-чиду̊м<pron>:любой<pron>
ar-čīz<pron>:коечто<pron>
ар-чӣз<pron>:коечто<pron>
ar-čīzin<pron>:какой_угодно<pron>
ар-чӣзин<pron>:какой_угодно<pron>
ač<pron>:разве<pron>
ач<pron>:разве<pron>
ača<pron>:вовсе<pron>
ача<pron>:вовсе<pron>
ačaθ<pron>:вовсе<pron>
ачаθ<pron>:вовсе<pron>
ačča<pron>:вовсе<pron>
ачча<pron>:вовсе<pron>
aččaθ<pron>:вовсе<pron>
аччаθ<pron>:вовсе<pron>
bāze<pron>:некоторые<pron>
бāзе<pron>:некоторые<pron>
bāzi<pron>:некоторые<pron>
бāзи<pron>:некоторые<pron>
bêmaduni<pron>:такойто<pron>
бêмадуни<pron>:такойто<pron>
bemadůni<pron>:такойто<pron>
бемаду̊ни<pron>:такойто<pron>
wam<pron>:ее_и_т_п<pron>
wам<pron>:ее_и_т_п<pron>
wim<pron>:ее_и_т_п<pron>
wим<pron>:ее_и_т_п<pron>
wam<pron>:ее<pron>
wам<pron>:ее<pron>
wim<pron>:ее<pron>
wим<pron>:ее<pron>
wam<pron>:ту<pron>
wам<pron>:ту<pron>
wim<pron>:ту<pron>
wим<pron>:ту<pron>
wam<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wам<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wim<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wим<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wā<pron>:прямая_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_мн_ч<pron>
wā<pron>:прямая_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_мн_ч<pron>
wāð<pron>:прямая_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_мн_ч<pron>
wāδ<pron>:прямая_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_мн_ч<pron>
wāðen<pron>:прямая_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_мн_ч<pron>
wāδен<pron>:прямая_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_мн_ч<pron>
wā<pron>:те<pron>
wā<pron>:те<pron>
wāð<pron>:те<pron>
wāδ<pron>:те<pron>
wāðen<pron>:те<pron>
wāδен<pron>:те<pron>
wā<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wā<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wāð<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wāδ<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wāðen<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wāδен<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
we<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указ_мест_дальн_ст_к_прямой_форме_w_них_и_т_п<pron>
wе<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указ_мест_дальн_ст_к_прямой_форме_w_них_и_т_п<pron>
wev<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указ_мест_дальн_ст_к_прямой_форме_w_них_и_т_п<pron>
wев<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указ_мест_дальн_ст_к_прямой_форме_w_них_и_т_п<pron>
weven<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указ_мест_дальн_ст_к_прямой_форме_w_них_и_т_п<pron>
wевен<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указ_мест_дальн_ст_к_прямой_форме_w_них_и_т_п<pron>
wef<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указ_мест_дальн_ст_к_прямой_форме_w_них_и_т_п<pron>
wеф<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указ_мест_дальн_ст_к_прямой_форме_w_них_и_т_п<pron>
we<pron>:их<pron>
wе<pron>:их<pron>
wev<pron>:их<pron>
wев<pron>:их<pron>
weven<pron>:их<pron>
wевен<pron>:их<pron>
wef<pron>:их<pron>
wеф<pron>:их<pron>
we<pron>:тех<pron>
wе<pron>:тех<pron>
wev<pron>:тех<pron>
wев<pron>:тех<pron>
weven<pron>:тех<pron>
wевен<pron>:тех<pron>
wef<pron>:тех<pron>
wеф<pron>:тех<pron>
we<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wе<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wev<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wев<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
weven<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wевен<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wef<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wеф<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wê-<pron>:косв_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_муж_р_к_прямой_форме_йу_и_т_п<pron>
wê-<pron>:косв_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_муж_р_к_прямой_форме_йу_и_т_п<pron>
wi<pron>:косв_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_муж_р_к_прямой_форме_йу_и_т_п<pron>
wи<pron>:косв_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_муж_р_к_прямой_форме_йу_и_т_п<pron>
wī-<pron>:косв_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_муж_р_к_прямой_форме_йу_и_т_п<pron>
wӣ-<pron>:косв_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_муж_р_к_прямой_форме_йу_и_т_п<pron>
wê-<pron>:его<pron>
wê-<pron>:его<pron>
wi<pron>:его<pron>
wи<pron>:его<pron>
wī-<pron>:его<pron>
wӣ-<pron>:его<pron>
wê-<pron>:того<pron>
wê-<pron>:того<pron>
wi<pron>:того<pron>
wи<pron>:того<pron>
wī-<pron>:того<pron>
wӣ-<pron>:того<pron>
wê-<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wê-<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wi<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wи<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wī-<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wӣ-<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
dam<pron>:косв_форма_указ_личн_мест_ж_р_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_йид<pron>
дам<pron>:косв_форма_указ_личн_мест_ж_р_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_йид<pron>
dim<pron>:косв_форма_указ_личн_мест_ж_р_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_йид<pron>
дим<pron>:косв_форма_указ_личн_мест_ж_р_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_йид<pron>
dam<pron>:ее_и_т_п<pron>
дам<pron>:ее_и_т_п<pron>
dim<pron>:ее_и_т_п<pron>
дим<pron>:ее_и_т_п<pron>
dam<pron>:ее<pron>
дам<pron>:ее<pron>
dim<pron>:ее<pron>
дим<pron>:ее<pron>
dam<pron>:ту_и_т_п<pron>
дам<pron>:ту_и_т_п<pron>
dim<pron>:ту_и_т_п<pron>
дим<pron>:ту_и_т_п<pron>
dam<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
дам<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
dim<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
дим<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
dā<pron>:они<pron>
дā<pron>:они<pron>
dāð<pron>:они<pron>
дāδ<pron>:они<pron>
dā<pron>:те<pron>
дā<pron>:те<pron>
dāð<pron>:те<pron>
дāδ<pron>:те<pron>
dā<pron>:адъективно_в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
дā<pron>:адъективно_в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
dāð<pron>:адъективно_в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
дāδ<pron>:адъективно_в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
dev<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_мн_ч_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_д<pron>
дев<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_мн_ч_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_д<pron>
deven<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_мн_ч_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_д<pron>
девен<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_мн_ч_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_д<pron>
def<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_мн_ч_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_д<pron>
деф<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_мн_ч_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_д<pron>
defen<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_мн_ч_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_д<pron>
дефен<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_мн_ч_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_д<pron>
dev<pron>:вторичное_мн_девен<pron>
дев<pron>:вторичное_мн_девен<pron>
deven<pron>:вторичное_мн_девен<pron>
девен<pron>:вторичное_мн_девен<pron>
def<pron>:вторичное_мн_девен<pron>
деф<pron>:вторичное_мн_девен<pron>
defen<pron>:вторичное_мн_девен<pron>
дефен<pron>:вторичное_мн_девен<pron>
dev<pron>:их<pron>
дев<pron>:их<pron>
deven<pron>:их<pron>
девен<pron>:их<pron>
def<pron>:их<pron>
деф<pron>:их<pron>
defen<pron>:их<pron>
дефен<pron>:их<pron>
dev<pron>:тех<pron>
дев<pron>:тех<pron>
deven<pron>:тех<pron>
девен<pron>:тех<pron>
def<pron>:тех<pron>
деф<pron>:тех<pron>
defen<pron>:тех<pron>
дефен<pron>:тех<pron>
dev<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
дев<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
deven<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
девен<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
def<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
деф<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
defen<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
дефен<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
digar-ga<pron>:другой<pron>
дигар-га<pron>:другой<pron>
digar-gad<pron>:другой<pron>
дигар-гад<pron>:другой<pron>
digar-gi<pron>:другой<pron>
дигар-ги<pron>:другой<pron>
digar-gid<pron>:другой<pron>
дигар-гид<pron>:другой<pron>
dis<pron>:такой<pron>
дис<pron>:такой<pron>
ik-dis<pron>:такой<pron>
ик-дис<pron>:такой<pron>
disāǰ<pron>:такой<pron>
дисāҷ<pron>:такой<pron>
důn<pron>:такой<pron>
ду̊н<pron>:такой<pron>
důnd<pron>:такой<pron>
ду̊нд<pron>:такой<pron>
ik-důn<pron>:такой<pron>
ик-ду̊н<pron>:такой<pron>
ik-důnd<pron>:такой<pron>
ик-ду̊нд<pron>:такой<pron>
idik<pron>:уменьшласк_к_йид<pron>
